Washington statutes.
RCW 43.01.035

Reports—Periods to be covered.

All biennial reports to the legislature and the governor shall cover the period comprising the first full fiscal year of the then current biennium and the last full fiscal year of the biennium immediately preceding. All annual reports to the governor shall cover the full fiscal year immediately preceding the date of said report.

[ 1965 c 8 s 43.01.035. Prior: 1953 c 184 s 3.]